cs: Typ nafukovací dekorace: Nafukovací zvíře; Nafukovací oblouk; Nafukovací balon; Nafukovací dominanta; Nafukovací lustr / závěsná dekorace; Nafukovací postava/maskot; Nafukovací sloup/pilíř; Nafukovací písmeno; Nafukovací číslo; Nafukovací palma / strom / rostlina; Nafukovací rekvizita do fotokoutku; Nafukovací kruh / trubicová dekorace; Nafukovací sezónní postava; Nafukovací stěna/pozadí; Nafukovací cedule na zahradu; Jiné
it: Tipo di decorazione gonfiabile: Animale gonfiabile; Arco gonfiabile; Palloncino gonfiabile; Centrotavola gonfiabile; Lampadario/decorazione da appendere gonfiabile; Personaggio/mascotte gonfiabile; Colonna/pilastro gonfiabile; Lettera gonfiabile; Numero gonfiabile; Palma/albero/pianta gonfiabile; Accessorio per cabina fotografica gonfiabile; Decorazione ad anello/tubo gonfiabile; Figura stagionale gonfiabile; Parete/fondale gonfiabile; Cartello da giardino gonfiabile; Altro
sl-SI: Vrsta napihljive dekoracije: Napihljiva žival; Napihljiv lok; Napihljiv balon; Napihljiv osrednji okras; Napihljiv lestenec/viseči okras; Napihljiv lik/maskota; Napihljiv steber; Napihljiva črka; Napihljiva številka; Napihljiva palma/drevo/rastlina; Napihljiv rekvizit za foto stojnico; Napihljiv okras v obliki obroča/tule; Napihljiva sezonska figura; Napihljiva stena/ozadje; Napihljiv dvoriščni napis; Drugo
fr: Type de décoration gonflable: Animal gonflable; Arche gonflable; Ballon gonflable; Centre de table gonflable; Lustre/décoration à suspendre gonflable; Personnage/mascotte gonflable; Colonne/pilier gonflable; Lettre gonflable; Numéro gonflable; Palmier/arbre/plante gonflable; Accessoire de cabine photo gonflable; Anneau/tube de décoration gonflable; Figurine saisonnière gonflable; Mur/fond gonflable; Panneau de jardin gonflable; Autre
ro-RO: Tip de decorațiuni gonflabile: Animal gonflabil; Arcadă gonflabilă; Balon gonflabil; Piesă centrală gonflabilă; Candelabru/decor suspendat gonflabil; Personaj/mascotă gonflabilă; Coloană/stâlp gonflabil; Literă gonflabilă; Număr gonflabil; Palmier/copac/plantă gonflabilă; Accesoriu gonflabil pentru cabină foto; Inel/tub decorativ gonflabil; Figurină sezonieră gonflabilă; Perete/fundal gonflabil; Panou publicitar de curte gonflabil; Altele
bg-BG: Вид надуваема декорация: Надуваемо животно; Надуваема арка; Надуваем балон; Надуваем централен елемент; Надуваем полилей/висяща декорация; Надуваем герой/талисман; Надуваема колона/стълб; Надуваема буква; Надуваема цифра; Надуваема палма/дърво/растение; Надуваем реквизит за фотобута; Надуваем ринг/туба; Надуваема сезонна фигура; Надуваема стена/фон; Надуваема табела за двор; Други
hr-HR: Vrsta dekoracije koja se napuhuje: Životinja na napuhavanje; Luk na napuhavanje; Balon na napuhavanje; Središnji ukras na napuhavanje; Luster/viseći ukras na napuhavanje; Lik/maskota na napuhavanje; Stup/kolona na napuhavanje; Slovo na napuhavanje; Broj na napuhavanje; Palma/stablo/biljka na napuhavanje; Rekvizit za fotografiranje na napuhavanje; Prsten/cijevni ukras na napuhavanje; Sezonska figura na napuhavanje; Zid/pozadina na napuhavanje; Natpis za dvorište na napuhavanje; Ostalo
es: Tipo de decoración inflable: Animal inflable; Arco inflable; Globo inflable; Centro de mesa inflable; Candelabro/decoración colgante inflable; Personaje/mascota inflable; Columna/pilar inflable; Letra inflable; Número inflable; Palmera/árbol/planta inflable; Accesorio inflable para cabina de fotos; Decoración inflable de anillo/tubo; Figura inflable de temporada; Pared/telón de fondo inflable; Letrero inflable para jardín; Otro
ja: 空気注入式装飾タイプ: インフレータブルアニマル; インフレータブルアーチ; インフレータブルバルーン; インフレータブルセンターピース; インフレータブルシャンデリア/吊り下げ装飾; インフレータブルキャラクター/マスコット; インフレータブルコラム/柱; インフレータブルレター; インフレータブルナンバー; インフレータブルパームツリー/木/植物; インフレータブルフォトブースプロップ; インフレータブルリング/チューブ装飾; インフレータブル季節のフィギュア; インフレータブルウォール/背景; インフレータブルヤードサイン; その他
lt-LT: Pripučiamos dekoracijos tipas: Pripučiamas gyvūnas; Pripučiama arka; Pripučiamas balionas; Pripučiama stalo dekoracija; Pripučiamas sietynas / kabanti dekoracija; Pripučiamas personažas / talismanas; Pripučiama kolona / stulpas; Pripučiama raidė; Pripučiamas skaičius; Pripučiama palmė / medis / augalas; Pripučiamas fotobūdelės rekvizitas; Pripučiamas žiedas / vamzdis; Pripučiama sezoninė figūra; Pripučiama siena / fonas; Pripučiamas kiemo ženklas; Kita
sv: Uppblåsbar dekorationstyp: Uppblåsbart djur; Uppblåsbar portal; Uppblåsbar ballong; Uppblåsbar mittdekoration; Uppblåsbar ljuskrona/hängande dekor; Uppblåsbar karaktär/maskot; Uppblåsbar kolonn/pelare; Uppblåsbar bokstav; Uppblåsbar siffra; Uppblåsbar palm/träd/växt; Uppblåsbar rekvisita för fotobås; Uppblåsbar ring/tub-dekor; Uppblåsbar säsongsfigur; Uppblåsbar vägg/bakgrund; Uppblåsbar trädgårdsskylt; Övrigt
tr: Şişme dekorasyon türü: Şişme hayvan; Şişme kemer; Şişme balon; Şişme orta süs; Şişme avize/sarkan dekorasyon; Şişme karakter/maskot; Şişme kolon/sütun; Şişme harf; Şişme sayı; Şişme palmiye/ağaç/bitki; Şişme fotoğraf kabini aksesuarı; Şişme halka/tüp dekorasyonu; Şişme sezonluk figür; Şişme duvar/arka plan; Şişme bahçe tabelası; Diğer
pt-PT: Tipo de decoração insuflável: Animal insuflável; Arco insuflável; Balão insuflável; Centro de mesa insuflável; Candelabro/decoração suspensa insuflável; Personagem/mascote insuflável; Coluna/pilar insuflável; Letra insuflável; Número insuflável; Palmeira/árvore/planta insuflável; Acessório insuflável para cabine fotográfica; Decoração de argola/tubo insuflável; Figura sazonal insuflável; Parede/fundo insuflável; Sinal de jardim insuflável; Outro
vi: Loại đồ trang trí bơm hơi: Con vật bơm hơi; Cổng vòm bơm hơi; Bong bóng bơm hơi; Vật trang trí trung tâm bơm hơi; Đèn chùm/vật trang trí treo bơm hơi; Nhân vật/linh vật bơm hơi; Cột/trụ bơm hơi; Chữ cái bơm hơi; Chữ số bơm hơi; Cây cọ/cây xanh/thực vật bơm hơi; Đạo cụ chụp ảnh bơm hơi; Vòng/ống trang trí bơm hơi; Hình nộm theo mùa bơm hơi; Tường/phông nền bơm hơi; Biển báo sân vườn bơm hơi; Khác
pl: Typ dekoracji dmuchanej: Dmuchane zwierzę; Dmuchana brama (łuk); Dmuchany balon; Dmuchana dekoracja centralna; Dmuchany żyrandol / dekoracja wisząca; Dmuchana postać / maskotka; Dmuchana kolumna / filar; Dmuchana litera; Dmuchana cyfra; Dmuchana palma / drzewo / roślina; Dmuchany rekwizyt do fotobudki; Dmuchana tuba / koło dekoracyjne; Dmuchana figura sezonowa; Dmuchana ścianka / tło; Dmuchany znak ogrodowy; Inne
da: Oppustelig dekorationstype: Oppusteligt dyr; Oppustelig portal; Oppustelig ballon; Oppustelig bordpynt; Oppustelig lysekrone/hængende dekoration; Oppustelig figur/maskot; Oppustelig søjle; Oppusteligt bogstav; Oppusteligt tal; Oppustelig palme/træ/plante; Oppustelig rekvisit til fotoboks; Oppustelig ring/rørdekoration; Oppustelig sæsonfigur; Oppustelig væg/baggrund; Oppusteligt haveskilt; Andet
nl: Opblaasdecoratie type: Opblaasbaar dier; Opblaasbare boog; Opblaasbare ballon; Opblaasbaar pronkstuk; Opblaasbare kroonluchter/hangende decoratie; Opblaasbaar personage/mascotte; Opblaasbare zuil/pilaar; Opblaasbare letter; Opblaasbaar cijfer; Opblaasbare palm/boom/plant; Opblaasbare fotobooth-prop; Opblaasbare ring-/buisdecoratie; Opblaasbare seizoensfiguur; Opblaasbare wand/achtergrond; Opblaasbaar tuinbord; Overige
nb: Oppblåsbar dekorasjonstype: Oppblåsbart dyr; Oppblåsbar bue; Oppblåsbar ballong; Oppblåsbart midtstykke; Oppblåsbar lysekrone/hengende dekorasjon; Oppblåsbar figur/maskot; Oppblåsbar søyle; Oppblåsbar bokstav; Oppblåsbart tall; Oppblåsbar palme/tre/plante; Oppblåsbar fotoboks-rekvisitt; Oppblåsbar ring/tubedekor; Oppblåsbar sesongfigur; Oppblåsbar vegg/bakgrunn; Oppblåsbart hageskilt; Annet
th: ประเภทของตกแต่งแบบเป่าลม: สัตว์เป่าลม; ซุ้มเป่าลม; ลูกโป่งเป่าลม; ของประดับกลางโต๊ะเป่าลม; โคมระย้า/ของตกแต่งแบบแขวนเป่าลม; ตัวละคร/มาสคอตเป่าลม; เสาเป่าลม; ตัวอักษรเป่าลม; ตัวเลขเป่าลม; ต้นปาล์ม/ต้นไม้/พืชเป่าลม; พร็อพตู้ถ่ายรูปเป่าลม; ของตกแต่งห่วง/ท่อเป่าลม; หุ่นตามเทศกาลเป่าลม; กำแพง/ฉากหลังเป่าลม; ป้ายสนามเป่าลม; อื่นๆ
pt-BR: Decoração inflável tipo: Animal inflável; Arco inflável; Balão inflável; Centro de mesa inflável; Lustre inflável/decoração suspensa; Personagem/mascote inflável; Coluna/pilar inflável; Letra inflável; Número inflável; Palmeira/árvore/planta inflável; Acessório para cabine de fotos inflável; Decoração em formato de anel/tubo inflável; Figura sazonal inflável; Parede/painel de fundo inflável; Placa de jardim inflável; Outros
el: Τύπος φουσκωτής διακόσμησης: Φουσκωτό ζώο; Φουσκωτή αψίδα; Φουσκωτό μπαλόνι; Φουσκωτό κεντρικό διακοσμητικό; Φουσκωτός πολυέλαιος/κρεμαστό διακοσμητικό; Φουσκωτός χαρακτήρας/μασκότ; Φουσκωτή κολόνα/πυλώνας; Φουσκωτό γράμμα; Φουσκωτός αριθμός; Φουσκωτός φοίνικας/δέντρο/φυτό; Φουσκωτό αξεσουάρ για photo booth; Φουσκωτός δακτύλιος/σωλήνας; Φουσκωτή εποχιακή φιγούρα; Φουσκωτός τοίχος/φόντο; Φουσκωτή πινακίδα κήπου; Άλλο
zh-CN: 充气装饰类型: 充气动物; 充气拱门; 充气气球; 充气桌面装饰; 充气枝形吊灯/悬挂装饰; 充气玩偶/吉祥物; 充气立柱/柱子; 充气字母; 充气数字; 充气棕榈树/树木/植物; 充气拍照道具; 充气圆环/管状装饰; 充气季节性人物; 充气墙/背景; 充气庭院标志; 其他
de: Typ der aufblasbaren Dekoration: Aufblasbares Tier; Aufblasbarer Bogen; Aufblasbarer Ballon; Aufblasbares Mittelstück; Aufblasbarer Kronleuchter/Hängedekoration; Aufblasbare Figur / Aufblasbares Maskottchen; Aufblasbare Säule; Aufblasbarer Buchstabe; Aufblasbare Zahl; Aufblasbare Palme/Baum/Pflanze; Aufblasbare Fotobox-Requisite; Aufblasbarer Ring/Schlauchdeko; Aufblasbare saisonale Figur; Aufblasbare Wand/Hintergrund; Aufblasbares Gartenschild; Sonstige
sk-SK: Typ nafukovacej dekorácie: Nafukovacie zviera; Nafukovací oblúk; Nafukovací balón; Nafukovacia centrálna dekorácia; Nafukovací luster/závesná dekorácia; Nafukovacia postavička/maskot; Nafukovací stĺp/pilier; Nafukovacie písmeno; Nafukovacie číslo; Nafukovacia palma/strom/rastlina; Nafukovacia rekvizita do fotobúdky; Nafukovací kruh/dekorácia v tvare trubice; Nafukovacia sezónna figúrka; Nafukovacia stena/pozadie; Nafukovací nápis na dvor; Iné
ko: 풍선 장식 유형: 공기 주입식 동물; 공기 주입식 아치; 공기 주입식 풍선; 공기 주입식 센터피스; 공기 주입식 샹들리에/행잉 데코; 공기 주입식 캐릭터/마스코트; 공기 주입식 기둥; 공기 주입식 글자; 공기 주입식 숫자; 공기 주입식 야자수/나무/식물; 공기 주입식 포토부스 소품; 공기 주입식 링/튜브 데코; 공기 주입식 시즌 피규어; 공기 주입식 벽/백드롭; 공기 주입식 마당 표지판; 기타
fi: Ilmatäytteisen koristeen tyyppi: Puhallettava eläin; Puhallettava kaari; Puhallettava ilmapallo; Puhallettava pöytäkoriste; Puhallettava kattokruunu/riippuva koriste; Puhallettava hahmo/maskotti; Puhallettava pylväs; Puhallettava kirjain; Puhallettava numero; Puhallettava palmu/puu/kasvi; Puhallettava valokuvakopin rekvisiitta; Puhallettava rengas/putkikoriste; Puhallettava kausihahmo; Puhallettava seinä/tausta; Puhallettava pihakyltti; Muu
ru: Тип надувного декора: Надувное животное; Надувная арка; Надувной шар; Надувное центральное украшение; Надувная люстра/подвесной декор; Надувной персонаж/талисман; Надувная колонна/столб; Надувная буква; Надувная цифра; Надувная пальма/дерево/растение; Надувной реквизит для фотозоны; Надувное кольцо/декор в виде трубы; Надувная сезонная фигура; Надувная стена/фон; Надувная табличка для двора; Другое
zh-TW: 充氣裝飾類型: 充氣動物; 充氣拱門; 充氣氣球; 充氣擺飾; 充氣吊燈/懸掛裝飾; 充氣角色/吉祥物; 充氣圓柱/立柱; 充氣字母; 充氣數字; 充氣棕櫚樹/樹木/植物; 充氣拍貼機道具; 充氣圓環/管狀裝飾; 充氣季節性人物; 充氣牆面/背景; 充氣庭院立牌; 其他
hu: Felfújható dekoráció típusa: Felfújható állat; Felfújható kapu; Felfújható ballon; Felfújható asztaldísz; Felfújható csillár/függődísz; Felfújható figura/kabalafugra; Felfújható oszlop/pillér; Felfújható betű; Felfújható szám; Felfújható pálma/fa/növény; Felfújható fotófülke-kellék; Felfújható gyűrű-/csődekoráció; Felfújható szezonális figura; Felfújható fal/háttér; Felfújható udvari tábla; Egyéb
en: Inflatable decoration type: Inflatable animal; Inflatable arch; Inflatable balloon; Inflatable centerpiece; Inflatable chandelier/hanging decor; Inflatable character/mascot; Inflatable column/pillar; Inflatable letter; Inflatable number; Inflatable palm/tree/plant; Inflatable photo booth prop; Inflatable ring/tube decor; Inflatable seasonal figure; Inflatable wall/backdrop; Inflatable yard sign; Other